Utah statutes.
78B-2-301.   Within six months.
An action may be brought within six months against a tax collector or the tax
collector's designee:
(1)  to recover any goods, wares, merchandise, other property seized in his
official capacity, or the price or value of any of it;
(2)  for damages for the seizure, detention, sale of, or injury to, any goods,
wares, merchandise, or other personal property seized;
(3)  for damages done to any person or property in making a seizure;
(4)  for money paid or seized under protest and which, it is claimed, ought to
be refunded.
